Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
448F]

ELECTROLOGISTS

Section

448F-1 Purpose

448F-2 Definitions

448F-3 License required

448F-4 Regulation of electrologists

448F-5 Examination, fees required

448F-6 Denial of licensure

448F-7 Refusal to permit examination or issue
license;

discipline; complaints; grounds;
proceedings; hearings

448F-8 Penalties

448F-9 Biennial renewal; failure to renew

448F-10 Repealed

448F-11 License without necessity of examination

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next